Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5164.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 227d. (1) Except as otherwise permitted by law, a person shall not transport or possess in or upon a motor vehicle while the motor vehicle is in operation or any self-propelled vehicle designed for land travel either of the following: (a) A firearm, other than a pistol, unless the firearm is unloaded and is 1 or more of the following: (i) Taken down. (ii) Enclosed in a case. (iii) Carried in the trunk of the vehicle. (iv) Inaccessible from the interior of the vehicle. (b) A pneumatic gun that expels a metallic BB or metallic pellet greater than .177 caliber unless the pneumatic gun is unloaded and is 1 or more of the following: (i) Taken down. (ii) Enclosed in a case. (iii) Carried in the trunk of the vehicle. (iv) Inaccessible from the interior of the vehicle. (2) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $100.00, or both. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.